Washington statutes.
RCW 6.19.060

Judgment—Costs.

If the claimant makes good on all or any part of the claim to title to the property or right to possession, judgment shall be entered for the claimant to the extent the claim has been established. If the claimant has given a bond, the bond shall be canceled or, if the claimant makes good on only a portion of the claim, a like proportion of the bond shall be canceled. If the claimant has not given a bond and the sheriff has retained possession of the property, judgment shall be entered in favor of the claimant for return of the property or its value.

If the claimant does not maintain the claim, judgment shall be rendered against the claimant. If the claimant has retained possession of the property pending trial on the claim, the judgment shall be entered against the claimant and, if the claimant has given a bond, against the sureties for the return of the property or for the value of the property or of the portion of the property for which the claim is not maintained, or for such lesser amount as shall not exceed the amount due on the original execution or attachment.

When the judgment is in favor of the sheriff for the entire property, the claimant shall pay the costs; when the claimant recovers all the property, judgment shall be given in favor of the claimant for costs; when the claimant recovers a portion of the property only, the costs shall be apportioned. When the claimant prevails, the costs may be taxed against the levying creditor or, if the court finds that the sheriff attached or levied upon the property without the exercise of due caution, the court may require the sheriff to pay the costs or any portion thereof.

[ 1987 c 442 s 506; Code 1881 s 354; 1877 p 76 s 357; 1869 p 90 s 350; 1854 p 179 s 259; RRS s 577. Formerly RCW 6.20.050.]